Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-835
State-managed funds; audit; report; confidential; unauthorized public disclosure, penalty.

(1) The Nebraska Investment Council shall conduct an audit of all state-managed funds and produce a report, which shall be electronically submitted using a secure method to the Committee on Pacific Conflict created under section 81-836 and the Governor within one hundred eighty days after April 17, 2024.

(2) The report shall:

(a) Summarize the investments at risk of substantially losing value or being frozen, seized, or appropriated by foreign adversaries in the event of a Pacific conflict;

(b) Summarize the investments in any arms industry of a foreign adversary;

(c) Summarize the investments in state-owned enterprises of a foreign adversary;

(d) Summarize the investments in companies domiciled within a foreign adversary or owned by a company domiciled within a foreign adversary; and

(e) Recommend strategies for the immediate and complete divestment of the assets described in subdivisions (a) through (d) of this subsection.

(3) Information contained in the report required under this section is confidential. Unauthorized public disclosure of such confidential information is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 5.
April 17, 2024